Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1762
Director of Banking and Finance; powers; rules and regulations.

In addition to specific authority granted elsewhere in the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act, the Director of Banking and Finance may adopt and promulgate rules, regulations, orders, or forms as are necessary to carry out the act. No rule, regulation, order, or form may be adopted unless the director finds that the action is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of purchasers and potential purchasers and is consistent with the purposes fairly intended by the policy and provisions of the act. All rules, regulations, orders, and forms of the director and the Department of Banking and Finance shall be published.

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 27.